dev/gsoc2011/monodix/adjective/adjective.bn.dix
<dictionary>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="enclitic">
      <!-- passthrough -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- ই -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ই</l>
          <r><j/>ই<s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- ও -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ও</l>
          <r><j/>ও<s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="টক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="বিরল__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="psint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তম</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="psint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="পৈতৃক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ঘন__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তর</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তম</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="মহিলা__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="নির্বাচিত"><i>নির্বাচিত</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="গভীর"><i>গভীর</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="চরম"><i>চরম</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সংক্ষিপ্ত"><i>সংক্ষিপ্ত</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ক্ষুদ্র"><i>ক্ষুদ্র</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="মধ্য"><i>মধ্য</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="চিহিত"><i>চিহিত</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বাস্তবায়িত"><i>বাস্তবায়িত</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="আগাম"><i>আগাম</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সফল"><i>সফল</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="আন্দাজ"><i>আন্দাজ</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="শীর্ষ"><i>শীর্ষ</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="দ্রুত"><i>দ্রুত</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="আগের"><i>আগের</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ব্যস্ত"><i>ব্যস্ত</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="এশিয়ান"><i>এশিয়ান</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বঞ্চিত"><i>বঞ্চিত</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ভারী"><i>ভারী</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="দোষী"><i>দোষী</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="তুচ্ছ"><i>তুচ্ছ</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="স্পষ্ট"><i>স্পষ্ট</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="কুমারী"><i>কুমারী</i><par n="মহিলা__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="উচ্চ"><i>উচ্চ</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="দূর"><i>দূর</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রিয়"><i>প্রিয়</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বিশেষ"><i>বিশেষ</i><par n="বিরল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সজ্জিত"><i>সজ্জিত</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="তীব্র"><i>তীব্র</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সুস্থ"><i>সুস্থ</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সক্রিয়"><i>সক্রিয়</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বিশাল"><i>বিশাল</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সহজ"><i>সহজ</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নিষ্ঠুর"><i>নিষ্ঠুর</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="কঠিন"><i>কঠিন</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ইরাকি"><i>ইরাকি</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="মহিলা"><i>মহিলা</i><par n="মহিলা__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="গর্ভবতী"><i>গর্ভবতী</i><par n="মহিলা__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="পূর্ণ"><i>পূর্ণ</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সৌদি"><i>সৌদি</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ঘন"><i>ঘন</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="মোট"><i>মোট</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সমৃদ্ধ"><i>সমৃদ্ধ</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সঠিক"><i>সঠিক</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="জার্মান"><i>জার্মান</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অলস"><i>অলস</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="কঠোর"><i>কঠোর</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="উন্নত"><i>উন্নত</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="আধুনিক"><i>আধুনিক</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নিরাপদ"><i>নিরাপদ</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অপর্যাপ্ত"><i>অপর্যাপ্ত</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সম্ভাব্য"><i>সম্ভাব্য</i><par n="বিরল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="হিংস্র"><i>হিংস্র</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="পূর্ববর্তী"><i>পূর্ববর্তী</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="পৈতৃক"><i>পৈতৃক</i><par n="পৈতৃক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রাচীন"><i>প্রাচীন</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সাম্প্রতিক"><i>সাম্প্রতিক</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রতীক"><i>প্রতীক</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="উজ্জ্বল"><i>উজ্জ্বল</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রধান"><i>প্রধান</i><par n="বিরল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সম্মত"><i>সম্মত</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="দুর্বল"><i>দুর্বল</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সুন্দর"><i>সুন্দর</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অন"><i>অন</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="পবিত্র"><i>পবিত্র</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সর্বশেষ"><i>সর্বশেষ</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বলিষ্ঠ"><i>বলিষ্ঠ</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অল্প"><i>অল্প</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বিরল"><i>বিরল</i><par n="বিরল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ক্ষুব্ধ"><i>ক্ষুব্ধ</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="পুরুষ"><i>পুরুষ</i><par n="পৈতৃক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অকেজো"><i>অকেজো</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নিজস্ব"><i>নিজস্ব</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অবৈধ"><i>অবৈধ</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="যোগ্য"><i>যোগ্য</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="মসৃণ"><i>মসৃণ</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="জয়ী"><i>জয়ী</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="স্বরাষ্ট্র"><i>স্বরাষ্ট্র</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নিশ্চিত"><i>নিশ্চিত</i><par n="বিরল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অন্ধকার"><i>অন্ধকার</i><par n="বিরল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="দীর্ঘ"><i>দীর্ঘ</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="উদ্ভট"><i>উদ্ভট</i><par n="বিরল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="দ্বিধাবিভক্ত"><i>দ্বিধাবিভক্ত</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ঘৃণ্য"><i>ঘৃণ্য</i><par n="বিরল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="করুণ"><i>করুণ</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বিপর্যস্ত"><i>বিপর্যস্ত</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বিচিত্র"><i>বিচিত্র</i><par n="বিরল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সরল"><i>সরল</i><par n="বিরল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সুন্দরী"><i>সুন্দরী</i><par n="মহিলা__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সুস্পষ্ট"><i>সুস্পষ্ট</i><par n="বিরল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অভিজ্ঞ"><i>অভিজ্ঞ</i><par n="বিরল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অবশিষ্ট"><i>অবশিষ্ট</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="প্লাবিত"><i>প্লাবিত</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বিশুদ্ধ"><i>বিশুদ্ধ</i><par n="বিরল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নিচু"><i>নিচু</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="জমজমাট"><i>জমজমাট</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সামান্য"><i>সামান্য</i><par n="বিরল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সদস্যবিশিষ্ট"><i>সদস্যবিশিষ্ট</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="জোরালো"><i>জোরালো</i><par n="বিরল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অকার্যকর"><i>অকার্যকর</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সার্থক"><i>সার্থক</i><par n="বিরল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রকট"><i>প্রকট</i><par n="বিরল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ব্ল্যাক"><i>ব্ল্যাক</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="খাঁটি"><i>খাঁটি</i><par n="বিরল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নিচ"><i>নিচ</i><par n="বিরল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রবাহিত"><i>প্রবাহিত</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ন্যুন"><i>ন্যুন</i><par n="বিরল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সরু"><i>সরু</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="উষ্ণ"><i>উষ্ণ</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সর্ববৃহৎ"><i>সর্ববৃহৎ</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রচন্ড"><i>প্রচন্ড</i><par n="বিরল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অনূদিত"><i>অনূদিত</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বিস্তীর্ণ"><i>বিস্তীর্ণ</i><par n="বিরল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নব"><i>নব</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সার্বভৌম"><i>সার্বভৌম</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="মৃদু"><i>মৃদু</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="জরুরী"><i>জরুরী</i><par n="বিরল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ঠান্ডা"><i>ঠান্ডা</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অধুনা"><i>অধুনা</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সম"><i>সম</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ফলিত"><i>ফলিত</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সুদীর্ঘ"><i>সুদীর্ঘ</i><par n="বিরল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="পরিস্কার"><i>পরিস্কার</i><par n="বিরল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="তরুন"><i>তরুন</i><par n="পৈতৃক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="পারদর্শী"><i>পারদর্শী</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="আদিম"><i>আদিম</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ভয়ংকর"><i>ভয়ংকর</i><par n="বিরল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নামকরা"><i>নামকরা</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="কনিষ্ঠ"><i>কনিষ্ঠ</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সিদ্ধ"><i>সিদ্ধ</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ভ্রান্ত"><i>ভ্রান্ত</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="দুরূহ"><i>দুরূহ</i><par n="বিরল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বিস্ময়কর"><i>বিস্ময়কর</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="চ্যাপ্টা"><i>চ্যাপ্টা</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ক্ষমতাচ্যুত"><i>ক্ষমতাচ্যুত</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="রুক্ষ"><i>রুক্ষ</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অর্ধপরিবাহী"><i>অর্ধপরিবাহী</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="দূর্বল"><i>দূর্বল</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ইন্ডাস্ট্রিয়াল"><i>ইন্ডাস্ট্রিয়াল</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ভয়ানক"><i>ভয়ানক</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নির্মল"><i>নির্মল</i><par n="বিরল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নগণ্য"><i>নগণ্য</i><par n="বিরল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="স্কেলার"><i>স্কেলার</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রখর"><i>প্রখর</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ইরানী"><i>ইরানী</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
